Tennessee, session 114, HB1295.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Shielding Tennesseans from
Oligarchic Power and Eliminating Lawless Obstruction of Necessities Act (STOP ELON Act)."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 14, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who interferes with the receipt by an individual
or entity of a loan, grant, or financial assistance that the individual or entity is lawfully
entitled to receive from the federal, state, or local government, with intent to deprive the
individual or entity of the loan, grant, or financial assistance.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is punished as theft pursuant to § 39-14-105.
The monetary value of property from multiple criminal acts that are charged in a single
violation of subsection (a) must be aggregated to establish value under this section.
(c) In addition to the criminal penalty in subsection (b), a victim of an offense
under this section may bring a civil action to recover the funds that the victim did not
receive because of the offense.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1295
003298
- 1 -